Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 10 Tax Apportionment

Wyoming is one of the few states which have adopted the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act,

as it relates to federal estate taxes. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Chapter is designed to clarify who is liable for payment of the estate taxes

when there is no provision in the decedent's will specifying how such tax shall be borne. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

In absence of direction in will. —

This chapter accomplishes three general purposes. First, it preserves the inherent and recognized right of a testator or testatrix to designate the fund from which such taxes are to be paid. Secondly, it abrogates the common law rule that, absent such a designation, the burden of payment was first to be imposed upon the residuary estate. Thirdly, and again absent a directive in the will to the contrary, it apportions the tax — without regard to special or general devises and bequests — commensurately to those benefited by the gifts of property upon which the federal tax has been imposed. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); In re Estate of Bell, 726 P.2d 71,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 602

(Wyo. 1986).

If a will does not provide for apportionment of the federal estate tax, and does not clearly direct against apportionment, then the tax will be apportioned under the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act in effect in Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Chapter does not apply to state inheritance taxes. —

Former §§ 39-6-802 and 39-6-806 (b) clearly and specifically place the burden of state inheritance taxes upon the recipients of the testatrix's bounty. That such was to continue as the public policy of this state was clearly demonstrated when the legislature, in adopting the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act in 1959, deleted from the prescribed form any reference to inheritance taxes payable to the state. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Federal charitable deduction preserved. —

Under the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act, the state has preserved the charitable deduction provided for by the Internal Revenue Code of 1954. Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Beneficiary may bring action to recover taxes paid over share.—

This chapter was drafted by the commissioners on uniform state laws. Their notes indicate it was their intention that an action would lie to recover taxes paid by one beneficiary of an estate, which should have been paid by another beneficiary. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Burden of establishing basis for nonapportionment

rests upon those contending against the statute. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

Directive against apportionment should be expressed in clear and unambiguous language.

In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972); Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388,

1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Depending, of course, upon the complexity of the testamentary plan, a few simple words may suffice to effectuate that purpose. It is essential, however, that the words, or combination of words, used in the will sufficiently indicate an intention against apportionment. In case of doubt the burden of the taxes must be left where the law places it. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Effect of ambiguous language. —

A somewhat ambiguous tax clause may contain language sufficient to disclose an intent on the part of the testator or testatrix to shift the burden of the federal estate tax levied upon decedent's property passing under the will and yet be insufficient to shift the tax levied upon the transfer of a decedent's interest in property which is not controlled by the will. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Intention of testatrix to direct against statutory apportionmentof taxes imposed on gifts held sufficiently expressed. —

See In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Matter of insurance raises federal question rather than question under apportionment statute.

In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d Inheritance, Estate and Gift Taxes §§ 271 to 331.

Renunciation of inheritance, devise or legacy as affecting state inheritance, estate or succession tax, 27 ALR3d 1354.

Liability of executor or administrator to estate because of overpaying or unnecessarily paying tax, 55 ALR3d 785.

Refund of state inheritance or estate tax where claims are proven against estate after tax was paid, 63 ALR3d 924.

Construction of will provisions expressly relating to the burden of estate or inheritance taxes, 69 ALR3d 122.

Construction and effect of will provisions not expressly mentioning payment of death taxes but relied on as affecting the burden of estate or inheritance taxes, 70 ALR3d 630.

Construction and application of statutes apportioning or prorating estate taxes, 71 ALR3d 247.

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 503 to 550

§ 2-10-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act”.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 10; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of the term “this act” as meaning §§

2-10-101

to

2-10-110

, see §

2-10-102

(vii).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Stevenson, 445 P.2d 753,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1968); In re Rennie's Estate, 430 F.2d 1388,

1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416

(10th Cir. 1970); In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 2-10-102.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

2-10-101

through

2-10-110

:

“Estate” means the gross estate of a decedent as determined for the purpose of federal estate tax;

“Fiduciary” means executor, administrator of any description, and trustee;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, corporation, government, political subdivision of a government, governmental agency or local governmental agency;

“Person interested in the estate” means any person entitled to receive or who has received from a decedent or by reason of the death of a decedent any property or interest therein included in the decedent’s estate. It includes a personal representative, guardian and trustee;

“State” means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;

“Tax” means the federal estate tax and interest and penalties imposed in addition to the tax;

“This act” means W.S.

2-10-101

through

2-10-110

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For short title provision stating that the term “this act” means the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act, see §

2-10-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion ‘Albatross’ Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

§ 2-10-103.
Among all persons interested in estate; exception.

Unless the will otherwise provides, the tax shall be apportioned among all persons interested in the estate. The apportionment shall be made in proportion that the value of the interest of each person interested in the estate bears to the total value of the interests of all persons interested in the estate. The values used in determining the tax shall be used for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Legislative intent. —

In the matter of apportionment of federal estate taxes, the public policy of this state, as declared by the legislature, is to apportion such taxes to the persons benefited. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

When taxes to be apportioned. —

This section provides that if the will fails to direct that estate taxes shall not be apportioned, or unless the will provides that estate taxes shall be apportioned in a particular manner, then the tax shall be apportioned under the statute among all persons interested in the estate. Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Section is clear and unambiguous.

In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

It requires apportionment if will does not otherwise provide.

In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

And directive against apportionment should be expressed in clear and unambiguous language.

In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388,

1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1970); In re Estate of Hilliar, 498 P.2d 1237,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1972).

Determining intention of grantor. —

If the intention of the grantor does not readily appear from the instrument, then the language used is to be read in the light of the surrounding circumstances. In re Rennie's Estate, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Sufficient expression of intent against statutory apportionment.—

A will directive that “all of the rest, residue and remainder of my estate, after paying all expenses, costs of administration and taxes …” is a sufficient expression of intent against statutory apportionment of taxes. In re Estate of Stratton, 756 P.2d 1342,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1988).

A will provision directing that all debts, administration expenses, specific bequests and taxes were to be paid prior to passing the remaining assets to the trustee for distribution, and a residuary clause providing that the residuary estate was to be divided in proportionate parts of five-eighths, one-eighth, one-eighth and one-eighth, taken together, evidenced a clear intent for the aftertax equality of the one-eighth shares to be distributed among the residuary distributees. In re Estate of Bell, 764 P.2d 689,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1988).

Estate taxes borne by residuary estate under will expresslyso providing. —

Where the testamentary intent of a testator was expressed in her will as follows: “All estate taxes, federal and state, imposed by reason of my death, with respect to any property (whether disposed of by this will or not) required to be included in my gross estate for estate tax purposes, and interest or penalties thereon, shall be borne by my residuary estate. All legacy, succession, inheritance and like taxes (as distinguished from estate taxes), imposed by reason of my death on any property (whether disposed of by this will or not), and interest to penalties thereon, shall be borne by my residuary estate,” it seems clear that she wished the estate taxes to be borne by her residuary estate, and the trial court was correct in its disposition of tax apportionment under the express provisions of the will and not according to the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act. In re Estate of Bell, 726 P.2d 71,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 602

(Wyo. 1986).

Burden of establishing basis for nonapportionment

rests upon those contending against the statute. In re Estate of Ogburn, 406 P.2d 655,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 526 (1966); In re Estate of Newell, 765 P.2d 1353,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1988).

Allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted

in making an apportionment. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970). See §

2-10-106

.

§ 2-10-104.
Probate court to determine; discretion allowed; presumption of correctness.

The probate court having jurisdiction over the administration of the estate of a decedent shall determine the apportionment of the tax. If there are no probate proceedings, the probate court of the county wherein the decedent was domiciled at death upon the application of the person required to pay the tax shall determine the apportionment of the tax.

If the probate court finds that it is inequitable to apportion interest and penalties in the manner provided in W.S.

2-10-103

because of special circumstances, it may direct apportionment thereof in the manner it finds equitable.

If the probate court finds that the assessment of penalties and interest assessed in relation to the tax is due to delay caused by the negligence of the fiduciary, the court may charge the fiduciary with the amount of the assessed penalties and interest.

In any suit or judicial proceeding to recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person in accordance with this act, the determination of the probate court in respect thereto shall be prima facie correct.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-104

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see § 2-10-102(a)(vii).

Subsection (d) applies to recover portion of tax from distributee.—

Subsection (d) of this section applies to any action to recover from another distributee the amount of tax which is apportioned to the person against whom an action is brought “in accordance with this act.” Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Determination not necessarily conclusive. —

The determination of the probate court with respect to apportionment is only prima facie correct and not necessarily conclusive. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Stevenson, 445 P.2d 753,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 2-10-105.
Withholding upon distribution of estate; right to recover deficiency; security required if distribution made prior to final apportionment.

The fiduciary or other person in possession of the property of the decedent required to pay the tax may withhold from any property distributable to any person interested in the estate, upon his distribution to him, the amount of tax attributable to his interest. If the property in possession of the fiduciary or other person required to pay the tax and distributable to any person interested in the estate is insufficient to satisfy the proportionate amount of the tax determined to be due from the person, the fiduciary or other person required to pay the tax may recover the deficiency from the person interested in the estate. If the property is not in the possession of the fiduciary or other person required to pay the tax, the fiduciary or the other person required to pay the tax may recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person in accordance with this act.

If property held by the fiduciary is distributed prior to final apportionment of the tax, the distributee shall provide a bond or other security for the apportionment liability in the form and amount prescribed by the fiduciary, with the approval of the probate court having jurisdiction of the administration of the estate.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-105

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see § 2-10-102(a)(vii).

Person required to pay may recover tax apportioned to another.—

Subsection (a) of this section expressly states that a person who has been required to pay may recover from any person who should have paid the amount of the tax apportioned to defendant “in accordance with this act.” Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Subsection (a) of this section provides, when the property held is insufficient to satisfy the proportionate amount determined to be due from a distributee, the person required to pay the tax may “recover” the deficiency from the person chargeable. Also, if property has not been held, the person required to pay may recover from the person chargeable the amount of tax apportioned to the person “in accordance with this act.” Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Subsection (b) contemplates that there may be a distribution prior to final apportionment

of the tax and specifies that in such case the distributee shall provide a bond or other security for his apportionment liability. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Stated

in

In re Estate of Stevenson, 445 P.2d 753,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 2-10-106.
Allowances for exemptions or deductions and credits.

In making an apportionment, allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted and for any deductions and credits allowed by the law imposing the tax.

Any exemption or deduction allowed by reason of the relationship of any person to the decedent or by reason of the purposes of the gift shall inure to the benefit of the person bearing such relationship or receiving the gift; except that when an interest is subject to a prior present interest which is now allowable as a deduction, the tax apportionable against the present interest shall be paid from principal.

Any deduction for property previously taxed and any credit for gift taxes or death taxes of a foreign country paid by the decedent or his estate shall inure to the proportionate benefit of all persons liable to apportionment.

Any credit for inheritance, succession or estate taxes or taxes in the nature thereof in respect to property or interests includable in the estate shall inure to the benefit of the persons or interests chargeable with the payment thereof to the extent that, or in proportion as the credit reduces the tax.

To the extent that property passing to or in trust for a surviving spouse or any charitable, public or similar gift or bequest does not constitute an allowable deduction for purposes of the tax solely by reason of an inheritance tax or other death tax imposed upon and deductible from the property, the property shall not be included in the computation provided for in W.S.

2-10-103

and to that extent no apportionment shall be made against the property. The sentence immediately preceding shall not apply to any case where the result will be to deprive the estate of a deduction otherwise allowable under applicable gift and estate laws, relating to deduction for state death taxes on transfers for public, charitable or religious uses.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 5; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-106

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 302.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e), substituted “applicable gift and estate laws” for “section 2053 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 of the United States.”

Allowances shall be made for any exemptions granted

in making an apportionment. Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

And directive depriving beneficiary of exemption must be clear.—

A directive setting forth an apportionment which deprives a beneficiary of a statutory exemption should be expressed in clear and unambiguous language. Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Hospital entitled to charitable deduction where apportionmentnot intended. —

Where testatrix did not intend to apportion the federal estate tax, a hospital was entitled to the charitable deduction as provided by § 2055(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 USCS § 2055(a)(2)) as preserved by this section of the Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act in Wyoming. Taggart v. United States, 306 F. Supp. 430, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12890 (D. Wyo. 1969), aff'd, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1970).

Decree of distribution may be attacked for fraud. —

The general rule that decrees of distribution are final adjudications binding upon all persons is subject to the exception that such decrees may be attacked, even in a collateral proceeding, for fraud. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

But in absence of fraud, decree of distribution becomes final

and res judicata when no appeal is taken. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

Even though erroneous. —

A decree of distribution is final and res judicata regardless of an erroneous distribution. The effect of the decree being res judicata means the probate proceedings are ended; that property of the estate remains distributed as it has been distributed; and that the discharge of the executor and his bonding company is final, unless a case of fraud is asserted and proved. Stevenson v. Hall, 473 P.2d 581,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1970).

But widow not allowed deduction may have remedy. —

Where a widow was not given the benefit of whatever exemption or deduction was allowed for her, in that respect the distribution made was erroneous. However, since there was no appeal from the decree of distribution and no timely action to vacate or set it aside, the decree became final and res judicata. But it does not necessarily follow that the widow is without remedy, if she can show causes of action accrued to her against some of the distributees of the estate when settlement of the federal estate tax was made. In re Estate of Stevenson, 445 P.2d 753,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 2-10-107.
Charging temporary interest and remainder.

No interest in income and no estate for years or for life or other temporary interest in any property or fund shall be subject to apportionment as between the temporary interest and the remainder. The tax on the temporary interest and the tax, if any, on the remainder shall be chargeable against the corpus of the property or funds subject to the temporary interest and remainder.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 6; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-107

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-10-108.
Institution of actions or proceedings to recover tax; generally; apportionment of amounts not collected.

Neither the fiduciary nor other person required to pay the tax shall be under any duty to institute any suit or proceeding to recover from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person until the expiration of the three (3) months next following final determination of the tax. A fiduciary or other person required to pay the tax who institutes the suit or proceeding within a reasonable time after the three (3) months period shall not be subject to any liability or surcharge because any portion of the tax apportioned to any person interested in the estate was collectible at a time following the death of the decedent but thereafter became uncollectible. If the fiduciary or other person required to pay the tax cannot collect from any person interested in the estate the amount of the tax apportioned to the person, the amount not recoverable shall be equitably apportioned among the other persons interested in the estate who are subject to apportionment.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 7; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-10-109.
Institution of actions or proceedings to recover tax; actions by nonresidents.

Subject to the conditions in subsection (b) of this section a fiduciary acting in another state or a person required to pay the tax resident in another state may institute an action in the courts of this state and may recover a proportionate amount of the federal estate tax, of an estate tax payable to another state or of a death duty due by a decedent’s estate to another state from a person interested in the estate who is either resident in this state or who owns property in this state subject to attachment or execution. For the purposes of the action the determination of apportionment by the court having jurisdiction of the administration of the decedent’s estate in the other state shall be prima facie correct.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall apply only:

If such other state affords a remedy substantially similar to that afforded in subsection (a) of this section;

With respect to federal estate tax, if apportionment thereof is authorized by congress.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 8; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-109

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-10-110.
Interpretation and construction.

This act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 171, § 9; W.S. 1977, §

2-7-110

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see § 2-10-102(a)(vii).

Severability. —

Section 11, ch. 171, Laws 1959, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Cited

in

In re Rennie's Estate, 430 F.2d 1388, 1970 U.S. App. LEXIS 7416 (10th Cir. 1970).